Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5902
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Insurers Examination Act is to provide an effective and efficient system for examining the activities, operations, financial condition, and affairs of all persons transacting the business of insurance in this state and all persons otherwise subject to the jurisdiction of the director. The provisions of the act are intended to enable the director to adopt a flexible system of examinations which directs resources as may be deemed appropriate and necessary for the administration of the insurance and insurance-related laws of this state.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 2.